Massachusetts, session 194th, H5321.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1 [18]. Section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, in any period
during which there is a critical shortage of qualified applicants for a specific job title or class of
job titles, an executive agency, department, county, city, town, district or authority may, upon
approval from the secretary of administration and finance, or the secretary’s designee, create one
or more critical shortage positions in the job title or class of job titles. The agency, department,
county, city, town, district or authority shall submit to the secretary or their designee any
documentation that the secretary or their designee shall require to determine the existence of a
critical shortage of qualified applicants for a job title or class of job titles. The secretary or the
secretary’s designee shall set the maximum number of critical shortage positions that may be
created by the requesting entity in the job title or class of job titles.
of 5

A critical shortage position authorized under this subsection shall exist and be active for a
period not to exceed 24 months; provided, however, that the position may be extended with the
approval of the secretary, or the secretary’s designee if, at the end of the 24 month period, a
critical shortage still exists for the job title or class of job titles. In addition to and
notwithstanding subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, or similar provision of any special law, and
notwithstanding section 181 of chapter 25 of the acts of 2009, as amended by section 11 of
chapter 42 of the acts of 2022, any person who has been retired and who is receiving a pension or
retirement allowance under the provisions of this chapter or any other general or special law
from the commonwealth, county, city, town, district or authority may, subject to all laws, rules
and regulations governing the employment of persons in the commonwealth, county, city, town,
district or authority, be employed in a critical shortage position. Provided, however, that any
such retired person in a critical shortage position under this subsection shall not be deemed to
have resumed active membership in any relevant retirement system and said service shall not be
counted as creditable service toward retirement and provided, further, that in the first 6 months
immediately following the effective date of retirement, the earnings received by such retired
person when added to any pension or retirement allowance they are receiving shall not exceed
the salary that is being paid for the position from which they retired or in which their
employment was terminated.
SECTION 2 [19]. Subsection (k) of section 20 of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as
appearing in 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 158, the words
“governing boards” and inserting in place thereof the followings words:- governing body.
SECTION 3 [83]. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall
be a special commission to investigate and study retiree healthcare and other non-pension
of 5

benefits. The commission shall consider the range of benefits that are or should be provided as
well as the current and anticipated future cost of providing them. The commission shall consider
and may make recommendations on how best to divide the costs between the commonwealth and
its employees and between the commonwealth’s municipalities and their employees. Upon
appropriation of sufficient funds, the commission shall engage professional advisors as needed to
accomplish its purposes.
The commission shall consist of the following members: 1 of whom shall be the secretary
of administration and finance, or the secretary’s designee; 1 of whom shall be the treasurer, or
the treasurer’s designee; 1 of whom shall be the executive director of the group insurance
commission, or the director’s designee; 1 of whom shall be a private citizen, appointed by the
governor, who shall serve as chair of the commission and shall not be a member of any of the
105 contributory retirement systems; 2 of whom shall be members of the house of
representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; 2 of whom shall be
members of the senate, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; 1 of whom shall be
selected by the governor from a list of 3 candidates submitted by the president of the
Massachusetts AFL-CIO; 2 of whom shall be members of the Massachusetts Municipal
Association, 1 of whom shall represent a rural community; and 1 of whom shall be a member of
the Retired State, County and Municipal Employees Association of Massachusetts.
The commission shall file a report of its recommendations and proposed legislation, if
any, with the clerks of the house and senate, the chairs of the house and senate committee on
ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on public service not later than June 30,
2026.
of 5

SECTION 4 [84]. Subsection (f) of section 91 of chapter 32, as inserted by section 18 of
this act, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 5 [88]. Section 84 shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
of 5